New Jersey, session 222, A2347.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    An employer in the State who is designated as a qualifying employer under the federal Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program (PSLF), established under the College Cost Reduction and Access Act (20 U.S.C. s.1087e), shall notify an employee during the explanation of benefits conducted at the beginning of employment of: a.     potential eligibility for the PSLF program; and b.    the requirements to be eligible for the PSLF program, which include, but are not limited to, the following: (1)   employment with a qualifying employer; (2)   a work schedule of at least 30 hours per week with the qualifying employer or a schedule that meets the qualifying employers definition of full-time work, whichever is greater; (3)   a balance with the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan (Direct Loan) Program offered by the U.S. Department of Education or consolidation of other federal student loans into a Direct Loan; (4)   repayment of a Direct Loan under an income-driven repayment plan; and (5)   payment of 120 monthly payments. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.